District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-1813.05

Additions to tax — Payment extensions.

Repealed.

July 16, 1947, 61 Stat. 357, ch. 258, art. I, title XIII, § 5
Mar. 31, 1956, 70 Stat. 79, ch. 154, § 14
Oct. 21, 1975, D.C. Law 1-23, title VI, § 606, 22 DCR 2113
Sept. 13, 1980, D.C. Law 3-92, § 503(d), 27 DCR 3390
Sept. 21, 1988, D.C. Law 7-141, § 2(i), 35 DCR 5398
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 406(dd)(2), 48 DCR 334
1981 Ed., § 47-1813.5.
1973 Ed., § 47-1589d.
Section 410(d) of D.C. Law 13-305 provided: “Section 406(a), (c), (j), (m), (p), (q), (s), (w), (bb), (dd), (ee), (hh) through (kk), (mm) through (oo), (qq) through (uu), (yy), (zz), (bbb), (ddd), and (fff) shall apply for all tax years or taxable periods beginning after December 31, 2000.”